src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!! Ojibwe noun morphology                           
! ========================================================================== !


!! # Prefixes


!! The prefixes

LEXICON Noun !!= * @CODE@

AN ; ! Animate nouns
IN ; ! Inanimate nouns
KINSHIP ;

LEXICON AN  !!= * @CODE@ animate nouns
ANSTEMS ; ! Absolutive (non-Px) declension



LEXICON IN !!= * @CODE@ inanimate nouns

! Absolutive (non-Px) declension
INSTEMS ; 

! Possessive declension
@U.noun.1sg@:nin@U.noun.1sg@ INSTEMS ;
@U.noun.2sg@:gi@U.noun.2sg@ INSTEMS ;
@U.noun.3sg@:o@U.noun.3sg@ INSTEMS ;

@U.noun.1pl@:nin@U.noun.1pl@ INSTEMS ;   ! exclusive Pl
@U.noun.12pl@:gi@U.noun.12pl@ INSTEMS ; ! inclusive Pl
@U.noun.2pl@:gi@U.noun.2pl@ INSTEMS ;   
@U.noun.3pl@:o@U.noun.3pl@ INSTEMS ;


LEXICON KINSHIP 

@U.noun.1sg@:nin@U.noun.1sg@ KINSHIPSTEMS ;
@U.noun.2sg@:gi@U.noun.2sg@ KINSHIPSTEMS ;
@U.noun.3sg@:o@U.noun.3sg@ KINSHIPSTEMS ;

@U.noun.1pl@:nin@U.noun.1pl@ KINSHIPSTEMS ;   ! exclusive Pl
@U.noun.12pl@:gi@U.noun.12pl@ KINSHIPSTEMS ; ! inclusive Pl
@U.noun.2pl@:gi@U.noun.2pl@ KINSHIPSTEMS ;   
@U.noun.3pl@:o@U.noun.3pl@ KINSHIPSTEMS ;



!! Thereafter, lexc directs us to the ../stems/nouns.lexc file
!! where we find all the stems.

!! The stems/nouns.lexc file will then direct us back here, to 
!! the suffixes.



!! # Suffixes

!! Here, we give person suffixes. The flag diacritics
!! match the prefixes in the stem file.

LEXICON ANDECL
+N+AN+Sg: # ;
+N+AN+Sg: AN_SUFF ;

LEXICON INDECL
+N+IN+Sg: # ;
+N+IN+Sg: IN_SUFF ;

LEXICON KINDECL
+N+AN+Sg: # ;
+N+AN+Sg: AN_SUFF ;


LEXICON AN_SUFF
+Px1Sg@U.noun.1sg@:0@U.noun.1sg@ # ;
+Px2Sg@U.noun.2sg@:0@U.noun.2sg@ # ;
+Px3Sg@U.noun.3sg@:0@U.noun.3sg@ # ;
+Px1Pl@U.noun.1pl@:@U.noun.1pl@%>inaan # ;   ! exclusive Pl
+Px12Pl@U.noun.12pl@:@U.noun.12pl@%>inaan # ; ! inclusive Pl
+Px2Pl@U.noun.2pl@:@U.noun.2pl@%>iwaa # ;
+Px3Pl@U.noun.3pl@:@U.noun.3pl@%>iwaa # ;

LEXICON IN_SUFF
+Px1Sg@U.noun.1sg@:0@U.noun.1sg@ # ;
+Px2Sg@U.noun.2sg@:0@U.noun.2sg@ # ;
+Px3Sg@U.noun.3sg@:0@U.noun.3sg@ # ;
+Px1Pl@U.noun.1pl@:@U.noun.1pl@%>inaan # ;   ! exclusive Pl
+Px12Pl@U.noun.12pl@:@U.noun.12pl@%>inaan # ; ! inclusive Pl
+Px2Pl@U.noun.2pl@:@U.noun.2pl@%>iwaa # ;
+Px3Pl@U.noun.3pl@:@U.noun.3pl@%>iwaa # ;
