src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!! Ojibwe noun stems                           
! ========================================================================== !

!! Note that both prefixes and suffixes are found in the file
!! ../affixes/nouns.lexc


!! The stems

!! ###  Animate Nouns
!    =============

LEXICON ANSTEMS

inini ANDECL "man" ; 
ikwe ANDECL "woman" ; 
makwa ANDECL "bear" ; 
mitig ANDECL "tree" ; 
giizis ANDECL "sun, month" ; 
animikii ANDECL "thunder" ; 
miigwan ANDECL "feather" ; 
odaabaan ANDECL "car" ; 
akik ANDECL "kettle" ; 
ma'iingan ANDECL "wolf" ;
amik ANDECL "beaver" ;
giigoonh ANDECL "fish" ;
waabooz ANDECL "rabbit" ;
mikwam ANDECL "ice" ;



!! ###  Inanimate Nouns
!    ===============

LEXICON INSTEMS !!= @CODE@ 

waakaa'igan INDECL "house" ;  !!= @CODE@
adopowin INDECL "table" ;     !!= @CODE@
waasechigan INDECL "window" ; 
zhoomin INDECL "grape" ; 
mitig INDECL "stick" ; 
aanakwad INDECL "cloud" ; 
zaaga'igan INDECL "lake" ; 
miikana INDECL "road" ; 
onaagaans INDECL "cup" ; 
ishkode INDECL "fire" ;
onaagan INDECL "dish" ;
mashkiki INDECL "plant" ;
ziibi INDECL "river" ;
makak INDECL "box" ;
abwi INDECL "paddle" ;


LEXICON KINSHIPSTEMS   !!= @CODE@

baabaa KINDECL "father" ;   !!= * @CODE@
maamaa KINDECL "mother" ;   !!= * @CODE@
gosis KINDECL "son" ;
daanis KINDECL "daughter" ;
mishoomis KINDECL "grandfather" ;
ookomis KINDECL "grandmother" ;
saye KINDECL "elder brother" ;
